Illinois, session 104th, SB2786.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Section 20-25.3 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/20-25.3 new)7    Sec. 20-25.3. Procurement modernization and artificial 8intelligence pilot program.9    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that: 10        (1) The State of Illinois and units of local 11    government within the State face persistent challenges in 12    achieving efficient, transparent, and equitable 13    procurement operations, resulting in delays, redundancy, 14    and inconsistent access to State and local contracts for 15    small businesses, minority-owned businesses, and 16    women-owned businesses. 17        (2) Modernizing procurement systems through artificial 18    intelligence and data-driven tools presents a responsible 19    means of improving efficiency, enhancing accountability, 20    and expanding participation in public contracting. 21        (3) Recent executive actions by the Governor 22    underscore the State's commitment to adopting secure, 23    ethical, and forward-looking technology in public   SB2786- 2 -LRB104 15744 HLH 28929 b1    administration. 2        (4) These initiatives reflect a broader statewide 3    policy objective: leveraging innovation for fiscal 4    responsibility, equity, and operational excellence across 5    government functions. 6        (5) A focused pilot program implementing AI-based 7    procurement analysis will allow Illinois to test and 8    validate these principles on a limited scale before 9    pursuing statewide modernization. 10    (b) The purposes of this Section are: to allocate funding 11for a limited duration pilot program that applies artificial 12intelligence tools to local government procurement management; 13to evaluate the impact of those tools on efficiency, equity, 14and cost savings; and to develop frameworks for future 15adoption of those tools. 16    (c) As used in this Section: 17    "AI" means artificial intelligence. 18    "Contractor" means Amp AI, doing business as Nozma. 19    "Department" means the Department of Central Management 20Services. 21    "Minority-owned business" has the meaning given to that 22term in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 23Persons with Disabilities Act. 24    "Small business" means a corporation or a concern, 25including its affiliates, that is independently owned and 26operated, not dominant in its field, and that employs fewer   SB2786- 3 -LRB104 15744 HLH 28929 b1than 50 full-time employees or has gross annual sales of less 2than $4,000,000. 3    "Women-owned business" has the meaning given to that term 4in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 5with Disabilities Act. 6    (d) Subject to the procedural requirements of this Code 7concerning sole source procurements, the Department may enter 8into a sole source contract with the contractor for a 6-month 9procurement modernization pilot project. 10    (e) Upon entering into a contract under subsection (d), 11the contractor shall, under the supervision of the Department 12and the Office of the Governor: 13        (1) conduct a comprehensive procurement modernization 14    study for units of local government benchmarking Illinois 15    against peer states; 16        (2) develop and test a proof-of-concept request for 17    proposal classification and qualification engine; 18        (3) conduct an equity and access analysis to ensure 19    inclusivity in local government contracting for small 20    businesses, minority-owned businesses, veteran-owned 21    businesses, and rural contractors; 22        (4) develop a data integrity and security framework 23    for future AI procurement applications; 24        (5) publish monthly progress dashboards;25        (6) host at least one stakeholder workshop; and26        (7) submit a final report to the Governor and General   SB2786- 4 -LRB104 15744 HLH 28929 b1    Assembly. 2    (f) The pilot program established under this Section shall 3be conducted in no more than 7 municipalities of the 4contractor's choosing, each having a population of less than 5200,000, to test the applicability of AI procurement systems 6across diverse regional and administrative environments. 7    (g) The pilot program established under this Section shall 8commence within 30 days after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and conclude 10within 6 months after the date on which the program commences 11unless the program is extended by the Governor for cause. 12    (h) The Department shall coordinate with the Office of 13Equity and Inclusion and the Legislative Ethics Commission to 14ensure that all pilot program activities comply with statutory 15and fiscal standards and shall submit a final report to the 16Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 17House of Representatives. 18    Based on pilot program results, the Department of Central 19Management Services shall prepare draft administrative rules 20or legislative proposals for broader procurement modernization 21initiatives, including performance metrics and workforce 22training. 23    The Department may also collaborate with other State 24agencies, units of local government, and institutions of 25higher education to identify and develop additional 26applications of artificial intelligence in public procurement,   SB2786- 5 -LRB104 15744 HLH 28929 b1contract management, and administrative services. 2    To promote equitable access to technology and innovation 3across Illinois, the Department may, through intergovernmental 4agreements or partnerships, make the tools, data frameworks, 5or best practices developed under this Act available to 6municipalities and townships that lack the fiscal or 7technological capacity to independently implement those 8systems. 9    The Department may also seek or accept public or private 10grants, philanthropic contributions, or cooperative funding to 11support the participation of financially constrained 12municipalities if those collaborations remain consistent with 13State procurement and ethics laws. Any such efforts shall be 14designed to leverage existing resources, avoid duplication of 15effort, and ensure that future expansion of the pilot program 16aligns with the State's equity, transparency, and fiscal 17responsibility goals.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.